zh-TW: 地墊固定系統: 防滑顆粒底面; 金屬孔眼; 無固定系統; 相容 OEM 固定掛鉤; 隨附固定扣; 魔鬼氈/止滑條; 其他
bg-BG: Система за закрепване/фиксиране на автомобилни стелки.: Противоплъзгаща основа с шипчета; Отвори с капси; Без система за закрепване; Съвместимост с оригинални куки (OEM); Включени щипки за закрепване; Велкро / лепящи ленти; Друго
es: Sistema de retención de alfombrilla: Reverso con puntos antideslizantes; Orificios con ojales; Sin sistema de retención; Compatible con ganchos de retención OEM; Clips de retención incluidos; Tiras de velcro/agarre; Otro
hu: Padlószőnyeg-rögzítő rendszer: Csúszásgátló tüskés hátoldal; Rögzítőlyukak; Rögzítőrendszer nélkül; Gyári (OEM) rögzítőkampókkal kompatibilis; Rögzítőkapcsokkal; Tépőzár/tapadószalag; Egyéb
lt-LT: Grindų kilimėlio tvirtinimo sistema: Neslystantis dygliuotas pagrindas; Tvirtinimo angos; Be tvirtinimo sistemos; Suderinama su OEM tvirtinimo kabliukais; Tvirtinimo spaustukai pridedami; „Velcro“ / lipnios juostelės; Kita
vi: Hệ thống giữ thảm trải sàn: Mặt lưng có gai chống trượt; Lỗ khoen; Không có hệ thống giữ; Tương thích móc giữ OEM; Kèm kẹp giữ; Băng dán Velcro/dải chống trượt; Khác
sv: Fastsättningssystem för golvmatta: Halkfri piggbaksida; Öljetthål; Inget fästsystem; Kompatibel med OEM-fästkrokar; Fästklämmor ingår; Kardborre/greppremsor; Övrigt
hr-HR: Sustav zadržavanja podne prostirke: Protuklizna podloga s izbočinama; Rupe s prstenovima; Bez sustava zadržavanja; Kompatibilno s OEM kukicama za zadržavanje; Uključene kopče za zadržavanje; Čičak / trake za prianjanje; Ostalo
it: Sistema di ritenzione del tappetino: Retro con gommini antiscivolo; Fori per occhielli; Nessun sistema di fissaggio; Compatibile con ganci di fissaggio OEM; Clip di fissaggio incluse; Strisce in velcro/antiscivolo; Altro
ru: Система фиксации напольного коврика: Противоскользящая шипованная основа; Отверстия с люверсами; Без системы крепления; Совместимость со штатными крючками крепления; Крепежные зажимы в комплекте; Липучки/полосы сцепления; Другое
th: ระบบล็อกพรมปูพื้น: ด้านหลังมีปุ่มกันลื่น; รูตาไก่; ไม่มีระบบยึดติด; รองรับตะขอยึดติด OEM; มีคลิปยึดติด; แถบตีนตุ๊กแก/กันลื่น; อื่นๆ
fi: Maton kiinnitysjärjestelmä: Liukuestenypyt pohjassa; Läpivientireiät; Ei kiinnitysjärjestelmää; Yhteensopiva alkuperäisten kiinnityskoukkujen kanssa; Sisältää kiinnikkeet; Tarra-/pitonauhat; Muu
pt-BR: Sistema de retenção do tapete: Fundo com pontas antiderrapantes; Orifícios com ilhós; Sem sistema de retenção; Compatível com ganchos de retenção originais; Clipes de retenção incluídos; Tiras de aderência/velcro; Outro
sl-SI: Sistem zadrževanja talne podloge: Protizdrsna podlaga s čepki; Luknje za pritrditev; Brez pritrditvenega sistema; Združljivo z originalnimi pritrditvenimi kavlji (OEM); Priložene pritrditvene sponke; Trakovi na ježka/za oprijem; Drugo
da: Fastgørelsessystem for gulvmåtte: Skridsikker bagside med knopper; Huller med snøreringe; Intet fastgørelsessystem; Kompatibel med OEM-fastgørelseskroge; Inklusive fastgørelsesklemmer; Velcro-/gribestrimler; Andet
de: Befestigungssystem der Fußmatte: Rutschfeste Noppenrückseite; Ösen; Kein Befestigungssystem; Kompatibel mit OEM-Befestigungshaken; Befestigungsclips enthalten; Klettverschluss/Haftstreifen; Sonstiges
nb: Gulvmatte kundebevaringssystem: Sklisikker nuppebakside; Maljehull; Ingen festesystem; Kompatibel med originale festekroker; Festeklemmer inkludert; Borrelås / gripestriper; Annet
pt-PT: Sistema de retenção de clientes para tapetes: Verso com relevos antiderrapantes; Furos com ilhós; Sem sistema de retenção; Compatível com ganchos de retenção OEM; Molas de retenção incluídas; Tiras de velcro/aderência; Outro
en: Floor mat retention system: Anti-slip nib backing; Grommet holes; No retention system; OEM retention hooks compatible; Retention clips included; Velcro/grip strips; Other
tr: Zemin paspası sabitleme sistemi: Kaymaz pürüzlü taban; Halka delikleri; Sabitleme sistemi yok; OEM sabitleme kancalarıyla uyumlu; Sabitleme klipsleri dahil; Cırt cırt/tutuş şeritleri; Diğer
ko: 바닥 매트 고정 장치 시스템: 미끄럼 방지 닙 백킹; 그로밋 구멍; 고정 시스템 없음; OEM 고정 후크 호환; 고정 클립 포함; 벨크로/그립 스트립; 기타
fr: Système de retenue du tapis de sol: Envers à picots antidérapants; Trous avec œillets; Aucun système de fixation; Compatible avec les crochets de fixation d’origine; Clips de fixation inclus; Bandes Velcro / antidérapantes; Autre
sk-SK: Systém upevnenia podlahovej rohože: Protišmyková výstupková úprava na rube; Upevňovacie oká; Bez upevňovacieho systému; Kompatibilné s originálnymi upevňovacími hákmi; Vrátane upevňovacích svoriek; Pásiky so suchým zipsom/úchopom; Iné
pl: Mata podłogowa systemu retencji klientów: Antypoślizgowe wypustki na spodzie; Otwory z przelotkami; Brak systemu mocowania; Zgodność z fabrycznymi haczykami mocującymi; Klipsy mocujące w zestawie; Rzepy / paski mocujące; Inny
zh-CN: 地垫保留系统: 防滑颗粒背衬; 索环孔; 无固定系统; 兼容 OEM 固定挂钩; 包含固定夹; 魔术贴/抓地条; 其他
nl: Vloermat bevestigingssysteem: Onderkant met antislip-noppen; Oogjes; Geen bevestigingssysteem; Compatibel met OEM-bevestigingshaken; Inclusief bevestigingsclips; Klittenband/gripstrips; Overige
el: Σύστημα συγκράτησης για πατάκι δαπέδου: Αντιολισθητική επένδυση με καρφάκια; Οπές με κρίκους; Χωρίς σύστημα συγκράτησης; Συμβατό με γάντζους συγκράτησης OEM; Περιλαμβάνονται κλιπ συγκράτησης; Λωρίδες Velcro/λαβής; Άλλο
ja: フロアマット維持システム: 滑り止めスパイク裏地; グロメット穴; 固定システムなし; 純正固定フック対応; 固定クリップ付属; ベルクロ/グリップストリップ; その他
cs: Způsob přichycení autokoberců: Protiskluzová úprava s výstupky; Otvory s průchodkami; Bez upevňovacího systému; Kompatibilní s OEM upevňovacími háčky; Včetně upevňovacích spon; Suchý zip / protiskluzové pásky; Ostatní
ro-RO: Sistem de fixare a covorașului de podea: Bază cu zimți antiderapanți; Găuri cu inele; Fără sistem de fixare; Compatibil cu cârlige de fixare OEM; Cleme de fixare incluse; Benzi Velcro/aderente; Altele